Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [214.165] REGULATING USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Administrative or supplementary support" means tasks performed to assist a licensed professional in the delivery of therapy or psychotherapy services that do not involve therapeutic communication. Administrative or supplementary support includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) preparing and maintaining client records, including but not limited to therapy notes; new text end new text begin (2) managing appointment scheduling and reminders; new text end new text begin (3) processing billing and insurance claims; new text end new text begin (4) analyzing anonymized data to track client progress or identify trends for review by a licensed professional; new text end new text begin (5) identifying and organizing external resources or referrals for client use; and new text end new text begin (6) drafting general communications related to therapy logistics that do not include therapeutic advice. new text end new text begin (c) "Artificial intelligence system" means any machine-based system that, for any explicit or implicit objective, calculates from the inputs the system receives how to generate outputs, including but not limited to content, decisions, predictions, or recommendations, that can influence physical or virtual environments. new text end new text begin (d) "Health-related licensing board" has the meaning given in section 214.01, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (e) "Licensed professional" means an individual who holds a valid license issued in Minnesota to provide therapy or psychotherapy services, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) a licensed psychologist providing clinical services under sections 148.88 to 148.981; new text end new text begin (2) a licensed social worker or independent clinical social worker under chapter 148E; new text end new text begin (3) a licensed professional counselor or licensed professional clinical counselor under sections 148B.50 to 148B.75; new text end new text begin (4) a licensed marriage and family therapist under sections 148B.06 to 148B.392; new text end new text begin (5) a licensed alcohol and drug counselor authorized to provide therapy or psychotherapy services under chapter 148F; new text end new text begin (6) a licensed behavioral analyst under sections 148.9981 to 148.9995; new text end new text begin (7) a licensed physician under chapter 147; and new text end new text begin (8) any other health professional authorized in Minnesota to provide therapy or psychotherapy services. new text end new text begin (f) "Peer support" means services provided by individuals with lived experience of mental health conditions or recovery from substance use that are intended to offer encouragement, understanding, and guidance without clinical intervention. new text end new text begin (g) "Religious counseling" means counseling provided by clergy members, pastoral counselors, or other religious leaders acting within the scope of their religious duties if the services are explicitly faith based and are not represented as clinical mental health, therapy, or psychotherapy services. new text end new text begin (h) "Therapeutic communication" means any verbal, nonverbal, or written interaction conducted in a clinical or professional setting that is intended to diagnose, treat, or address an individual's mental, emotional, or behavioral health concerns. Therapeutic communication includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) directly interacting with clients for the purpose of understanding or reflecting the client's thoughts, emotions, or experiences; new text end new text begin (2) providing guidance, therapeutic strategies, or interventions designed to achieve mental health outcomes; new text end new text begin (3) offering emotional support, reassurance, or empathy in response to psychological or emotional distress; new text end new text begin (4) collaborating with clients to develop or modify therapeutic goals or treatment plans; and new text end new text begin (5) offering behavioral feedback intended to promote psychological growth or address mental health conditions. new text end new text begin (i) "Therapy or psychotherapy services" means services provided to diagnose, treat, or improve an individual's mental health or behavioral health. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibited uses of artificial intelligence. new text end new text begin (a) An individual, corporation, or entity must not provide, advertise, or otherwise offer therapy or psychotherapy services to the public in Minnesota unless the therapy or psychotherapy services are conducted by an individual who is a licensed professional. new text end new text begin (b) A licensed professional must not use artificial intelligence systems to: new text end new text begin (1) make independent therapeutic decisions; new text end new text begin (2) directly interact with clients in any form of therapeutic communication; or new text end new text begin (3) generate therapeutic recommendations or treatment plans without review and approval by the licensed professional. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Permitted uses of artificial intelligence. new text end new text begin A licensed professional may use artificial intelligence systems to assist in providing administrative or supplementary support in therapy or psychotherapy services if the licensed professional maintains full responsibility for all interactions, outputs, and data use associated with the system. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Enforcement, penalties, and hearings. new text end new text begin (a) Any individual, corporation, or entity found in violation of this section must pay a civil penalty to the health-related licensing board responsible for regulating the relevant profession in an amount not to exceed $10,000 per violation. new text end new text begin (b) The health-related licensing board responsible for regulating the relevant profession must determine the amount of the penalty so as to deprive the licensee of any economic advantage gained by reason of the violation, to discourage similar violations, or to reimburse the board for the cost of investigation and proceeding, including but not limited to fees paid for services provided by the Court of Administrative Hearings, legal and investigative services provided by the Office of the Attorney General, court reporters, witnesses, reproduction of records, board members' per diem compensation, board staff time, and travel costs and expenses incurred by board staff and board members. new text end new text begin (c) The health-related licensing board responsible for regulating the relevant profession must provide the individual, corporation, or entity with written notice of the finding of a violation and the imposition of a civil penalty that includes the reasons for the finding, the amount of the civil penalty, and the right to request a hearing under chapter 14. An individual, corporation, or entity must request a contested case hearing under chapter 14 from the health-related licensing board within 30 days of receiving the notice in this paragraph. new text end new text begin (d) An individual, corporation, or entity found in violation of this section must pay the civil penalty within 60 days after notice of the violation and imposition of civil penalty under paragraph (c) or after the date of an order issued following a contested case hearing under chapter 14, whichever is later. new text end new text begin (e) Each health-related licensing board responsible for regulating a licensed professional under this section has the authority to investigate any actual, alleged, or suspected violation of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) religious counseling; new text end new text begin (2) peer support; or new text end new text begin (3) self-help materials and educational resources that are available to the public and do not purport to offer therapy or psychotherapy services. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end